Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2901
Act, how cited.

Sections 38-2901 to 38-2929 shall be known and may be cited as the Physical Therapy Practice Act.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 118;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1,362;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 994.